Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Chapter 2

Local Option—Manufacture Only

57-2-101. “Intoxicating liquors” and “intoxicating drinks” defined — Fuel alcohol exception.

“Intoxicating liquors” or “intoxicating drinks,” as defined in this chapter, means and includes alcohol, spirits, liquors, wines and every liquid or solid, patented or not, containing alcohol, spirits, liquor or wine, and capable of being consumed by human beings; but nothing in this chapter shall be construed or defined as including or relating to the manufacture of beer as defined in § 57-5-101(b).

This title shall not apply to fuel alcohol as it is defined in § 67-3-1203, and this title shall not apply to ethanol that is produced in a facility whose production process is primarily a wet milling process, sold and transported in bulk lots of five thousand gallons (5,000 gals.) or more and not packaged for retail sale by the holder of a valid alcohol fuels permit or a valid distilled spirits permit:

For export to another country;

To a domestic manufacturer, distiller, vintner, or rectifier who is a duly licensed alcohol beverage or liquor manufacturer in this or some other state; or

To a manufacturer who uses the ethanol to create a product which is incapable of human consumption or contains less than one-half of one percent (0.5%) alcohol by volume.

This title shall not apply to the production of products that have received approval from the alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau (TTB) as a non-beverage product.

Acts 1937, ch. 193, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-103; Acts 1980, ch. 786, § 3; 1997, ch. 155, § 1; 2012, ch. 968, § 1; 2014, ch. 861, § 3; 2017, ch. 338, § 5.

Cross-References. Beer wholesaler-supplier relations, title 57, ch. 5, part 5.

Definition of ethanol, §67-3-103.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 2, 5, 6, 8.

57-2-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 1937, ch. 193, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-102; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 301, § 1, effective May 8, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former §57-2-102 concerned privilege taxes on manufacturer — license.

57-2-103. Manufacturing of intoxicating liquors — Petition — Election.

The county legislative body of any county shall have the right and power, and such county authorities shall have the duty, to call and direct the county election commission to hold an election at any time, upon the filing and presentation of a petition bearing the genuine signatures of ten percent (10%) or more of the qualified voters of such county, based upon the number of votes cast in the last preceding presidential election in such county. Such petition shall be addressed to the county legislative body, and shall contain such language as to request, or to call upon the county legislative body, to call an election of the qualified voters of the county upon the question of permitting and legalizing the manufacture of intoxicating liquors and other intoxicating drinks within the boundaries of the county.

Upon the adoption of a motion or resolution by the county legislative body directing the holding of an election, the county clerk shall file a certified copy of the motion or resolution with the county election commission.

If a majority of the qualified votes cast in such election, in a county so holding an election, favors the manufacture of intoxicating liquors or other intoxicating drinks, as herein provided, in that event, it shall be lawful to manufacture intoxicating liquors and/or intoxicating drinks within the boundaries of such county.

Notwithstanding subsections (a)-(c), it shall be lawful to manufacture intoxicating liquors or intoxicating drinks, or both, within the boundaries of:

A municipality if both retail package sales and consumption of alcoholic beverages on the premises have been approved through referendum of voters within such municipality;

A municipality that has approved consumption of alcoholic beverages on the premises within the municipality by local option election and that is located in a county having a population of not less than forty-eight thousand five hundred (48,500) and not more than forty-eight thousand six hundred (48,600), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The unincorporated areas of a county, or a municipality which has a population of less than one thousand (1,000) persons in such county, if any jurisdiction located within such county has approved retail package sales through referendum of voters and any jurisdiction located within such county has approved consumption of alcoholic beverages on the premises through referendum of voters or if the county is included in the Tennessee River resort district as defined in § 57-4-102 and retail package sales have been approved through referendum by the voters in any jurisdiction within such county;

Any municipality authorized under § 57-4-102(27) to allow facilities or establishments in such municipality to sell alcoholic beverages or wine for on premises consumption;

Any county or municipality where it was lawful to have manufacturing of intoxicating liquors or intoxicating drinks, or both under this subsection (d) as it read prior to July 1, 2013; or

Any county that has at least three (3) establishments, located in such county or in any municipality in such county, licensed under § 57-4-102(27) to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption if such county was included in this subsection (d) as it read prior to July 1, 2013.

Notwithstanding subdivision (d)(1), the county legislative body of any such county may adopt a resolution to remove the unincorporated areas of the county from the application of this subsection (d) subject to the restrictions in subdivision (d)(2)(B). The county mayor shall notify the alcoholic beverage commission if such action is taken and approved.

Such action may be taken by the county legislative body pursuant to subdivision (d)(2)(A) until a written notification is filed with the county mayor by any person as an official notice that the person intends to pursue all lawful avenues to manufacture intoxicating liquors or intoxicating drinks, or both, within the unincorporated areas of the county. Once the notice is filed, no action may be taken by the county legislative body unless such interest is withdrawn or the person's application to manufacture such intoxicating liquors or intoxicating drinks, or both, is denied by the state or federal government. A written notification as described pursuant to this subdivision (d)(2)(B) may not be filed with the county mayor until at least forty-five (45) days after July 1, 2013.

If a county adopts a resolution pursuant to subdivision (d)(2)(A), the county may at a later date adopt a resolution reversing such action. The county mayor shall notify the alcoholic beverage commission if such action is taken and approved.

Notwithstanding subdivision (d)(1), the legislative body of any municipality may adopt a resolution to remove the municipality from the application of this subsection (d) subject to the restrictions in subdivision (d)(3)(B). The legislative body of the municipality shall notify the alcoholic beverage commission if such action is taken and approved.

Such action may be taken by the legislative body of the municipality pursuant to subdivision (d)(3)(A) until a written notification is filed with the legislative body of the municipality by any person as an official notice that the person intends to pursue all lawful avenues to manufacture intoxicating liquors or intoxicating drinks, or both, within the boundaries of the municipality. Once the notice is filed, no action may be taken by the legislative body of the municipality unless such interest is withdrawn or the person's application to manufacture such intoxicating liquors or intoxicating drinks, or both, is denied by the state or federal government. A written notification as described pursuant to this subdivision (d)(3)(B) may not be filed with the legislative body of the municipality until at least forty-five (45) days after July 1, 2013.

If a municipality adopts a resolution pursuant to subdivision (d)(3)(A), the municipality may at a later date adopt a resolution reversing such action. The legislative body of the municipality shall notify the alcoholic beverage commission if such action is taken and approved.

If a manufacturer that has been issued a license pursuant to this subsection (d) is also selling the manufacturer's alcoholic beverages or products at retail and the manufacturer is located in a jurisdiction that pursuant to § 57-5-105 has established a distance requirement that restricts the storage, sale or manufacture of beer from places of public gatherings or in a municipality or Class B county that pursuant to § 57-5-106 has adopted proper ordinances governing the storage, sale, manufacture and/or distribution of beer within its jurisdictional boundary, then any distance requirement related to a building used for religious purposes or a building used as an elementary or secondary school in effect in that jurisdiction shall apply to the building used for the retail sale of the manufacturer's alcoholic beverages or products containing alcohol. The measurement shall be a building-to-building measurement.

Notwithstanding subsections (a)-(c) and subdivision (d)(1), it shall be lawful to manufacture intoxicating liquors or intoxicating drinks, or both, on property that is listed on the National Register of Historic Places and where intoxicating liquors or intoxicating drinks, or both, were previously distilled on such property, or approximately on such property.

A municipality as described in § 57-4-102(27)(B) may adopt an ordinance imposing a minimum distance, not to exceed one thousand feet (1,000'), between distilleries manufacturing distilled spirits; provided, that the ordinance shall not apply to or affect any licensed distillery in operation and open to the public prior to April 12, 2016. A distillery that is exempt from an ordinance adopted under this subdivision (d)(6) shall remain exempt from any ordinance adopted under this subdivision (d)(6) upon the transfer of any ownership interest in the distillery to a successor in interest.

Any manufacturer's license issued pursuant to subsection (c) or (d) shall comply with § 57-3-202.

Notwithstanding subsections (a)-(c), it shall be lawful to manufacture high alcohol content beer as defined in § 57-3-101(a) within the boundaries of:

A municipality if both retail package sales and consumption of alcoholic beverages on the premises have been approved through voter referendum of voters within such municipality; or

The unincorporated areas of a county if any jurisdiction located within such county has approved retail package sales through referendum of voters and any jurisdiction located within such county has approved consumption of alcoholic beverages on the premises through referendum of voters or if the county is included in the Tennessee River resort district as defined in § 57-4-102 and retail package sales have been approved through voter referendum in any jurisdiction within the county.

Any manufacturer authorized pursuant to subdivision (f)(1) must also hold a brewer's notice approved by the United States department of the treasury, alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau, or any successor federal beer manufacturing permit granted by a federal bureau having jurisdiction over the manufacture of beer.

In all jurisdictions not meeting the requirements of subdivision (f)(1), it shall be lawful to manufacture high alcohol content beer as defined in § 57-3-101(a) within the boundaries of a municipality or in the unincorporated area of such county upon such jurisdiction meeting the requirements of subsections (a)-(c), and if the manufacturer also holds a brewer's notice approved by the United States department of the treasury, alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau, or any successor federal beer manufacturing permit granted by a federal bureau having jurisdiction over the manufacture of beer.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, it shall be lawful for any manufacturer of high alcohol content beer authorized to manufacture such beverages pursuant to subdivision (f)(1) to also brew beer as this term is defined in § 57-5-101(b) on the same premises of the manufacturer of high alcohol content beer, upon meeting necessary federal, state and local license requirements.

The general assembly hereby ratifies any action which may have been taken by the alcoholic beverage commission in issuing a license to a manufacturer of high alcohol content beer prior to June 10, 2011.

The general assembly hereby ratifies any action which may have been taken by the alcoholic beverage commission in issuing a license to a manufacturer of intoxicating liquors or intoxicating drinks, or both prior to July 1, 2013.

Any person who has received a manufacturing license for intoxicating liquors or intoxicating drinks, or both from the alcoholic beverage commission or who has an application for such manufacturing license pending with the commission on July 1, 2013, may still receive and be able to renew the license if the person was authorized to apply for such license under this section prior to July 1, 2013.

Any person who has received the necessary permit to manufacture intoxicating liquors or intoxicating drinks, or both from the alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau (TTB) or who has an application for such permit pending with the TTB on July 1, 2013, may still receive and be able to renew a manufacturing license from the alcoholic beverage commission if the person was authorized to apply for such manufacturing license under this section prior to July 1, 2013.

If any person obtains a manufacturing permit pursuant to this subsection (h), then the jurisdiction such licensee is located in shall be allowed to have other manufacturers located in such jurisdiction, notwithstanding subdivision (d)(1).

Acts 1937, ch. 193, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.1; impl. am. Acts 1953, ch. 88, § 1; Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4(65); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-101; Acts 2009, ch. 524, § 1; 2011, ch. 448, § 12; 2012, ch. 515, § 1; 2013, ch. 445, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 875, § 1; 2016, ch. 786, § 1; 2018, ch. 650, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added present (d)(1)(B) and redesignated former (d)(1)(B)-(E) as present (d)(1)(C)-(F), respectively.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 650, § 2. April 9, 2018.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 6, 14, 22; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus, § 9.

Attorney General Opinions. Manufacture of intoxicating liquors in Hamilton County. OAG 12-93, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 91 (10/3/12).

57-2-104. Possession, storage or transportation by manufacturer lawful — Rights limited.

A manufacturer licensed pursuant to §57-2-102 [repealed], or the authorized agent of such licensee, may possess, store, or transport the products of the manufacturing plant within, over, and across the state; provided, that any alcoholic beverages or wine produced at a plant located within this state must be stored within a county that has authorized the manufacture of intoxicating liquors pursuant to §57-2-103 or in a county adjacent to a county that has authorized the manufacturing operation, and such possession shall be limited to storage facilities owned, authorized, or leased by such manufacturer; and further provided, that such licensee may also possess such alcoholic beverages or wine while being transported, whether within or outside of the state. Common carriers may transport the products of such manufacturing plant only pursuant to an agreement or contract with a licensee under this title.

Acts 1937, ch. 193, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-104; Acts 2011, ch. 448, § 4; 2013, ch. 341, § 2; 2018, ch. 717, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Section 57-2-102, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 301, § 1.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote the section which read: “It is lawful for the holder of a license issued pursuant to §57-2-102, or the authorized agent of such licensee, to possess, store or transport the products of the manufacturing plant within, over and across the state; provided, that any alcoholic beverages or wine produced at a plant located within this state shall be stored by the licensee only within the county authorizing the operation or in a county adjacent to the county authorizing the manufacturing operation, and such possession shall be limited to storage facilities of such manufacturer; and further provided, that such licensee may also possess such alcoholic beverages or wine while being transported, whether within or outside of the state. It is lawful for common carriers to transport the products of such manufacturing plant only pursuant to an agreement or contract with a licensee under this title.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 717, § 2. April 12, 2018.

57-2-105. Restrictions on sale within state.

Except as otherwise provided by law, nothing in this chapter shall be construed as licensing or legalizing the sale of intoxicating liquors and/or other intoxicating drinks within the state by any distillery or manufacturing plant authorized under this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed so as to repeal, or in any manner abridge or affect the present laws of this state concerning the sale of intoxicating liquors of every kind.

Acts 1937, ch. 193, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.1; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-105; Acts 2011, ch. 448, § 5.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 6.

57-2-106. Restrictions on labeling of intoxicating liquors as Tennessee whiskeys.

An intoxicating liquor may not be advertised, described, labeled, named, sold or referred to for marketing or sales purposes as “Tennessee Whiskey,” “Tennessee Whisky,” “Tennessee Sour Mash Whiskey,” or “Tennessee Sour Mash Whisky” unless the intoxicating liquor is:

Manufactured in Tennessee;

Made of a grain mixture that is at least fifty-one percent (51%) corn;

Distilled to no more than one hundred sixty (160) proof or eighty percent (80%) alcohol by volume;

Aged in new, charred oak barrels in Tennessee;

Filtered through maple charcoal prior to aging;

Placed in the barrel at no more than one hundred twenty-five (125) proof or sixty-two and one-half percent (62.5%) alcohol by volume; and

Bottled at not less than eighty (80) proof or forty percent (40%) alcohol by volume.

Any manufacturer who violates this section shall be subject to suspension or revocation of its license for a period of not less than one (1) year.

Subdivision (a)(5) shall not apply to intoxicating liquor manufactured at a distillery located in a county that authorized the manufacturing process by referendum after January 1, 1979, and prior to January 1, 1980; provided, however, that any such distillery was first licensed by the state alcoholic beverage commission after January 1, 2000, and before January 1, 2001.

Any Tennessee corporation, limited liability company or proprietorship that holds a federal distiller basic permit pursuant to 27 U.S.C. § 204 and had a licensed manufacturing operation in this state as of January 1, 2013, may label, market and sell any product owned or contracted to purchase by such permit holder on or after July 1, 2013, for a period of thirty-six (36) months; provided, however, that any product manufactured at such distillery after July 1, 2013, shall meet all the requirements of subsection (a) to be advertised, described, labeled, named, sold or referred to for marketing or sales purposes as “Tennessee Whiskey,” “Tennessee Whisky,” “Tennessee Sour Mash Whiskey,” or “Tennessee Sour Mash Whisky”.

This subsection (d) shall apply to any product that is referred to as “Tennessee Whiskey,” “Tennessee Whisky,” “Tennessee Sour Mash Whiskey,” or “Tennessee Sour Mash Whisky” under 27 CFR part 5 on July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 341, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §57-2-106(c) constitutes impermissible discrimination in violation of the equal protection provisions of the Fourteenth Amendment to the United States Constitution, as well as impermissible class legislation in violation of article XI, section 8, of the Tennessee Constitution. OAG 15-23, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 23 (3/18/15).

57-2-107. Hours of sale for licensed manufacturer to sell at retail.

The hours of sale for a manufacturer licensed to sell products at retail under §57-3-204(e) shall be the same as for a manufacturer licensed to sell products at retail under §57-3-202.

Acts 2013, ch. 341, § 3.

57-2-108. Use of name “Tennessee Moonshine”.

Beginning July 1, 2016, an intoxicating liquor may not be advertised, described, labeled, named, sold, or referred to for marketing or sales purposes as “Tennessee Moonshine” unless the intoxicating liquor is distilled in Tennessee.

Any manufacturer who violates this section shall be subject to suspension or revocation of its license for a period of not less than one (1) year.

Acts 2015, ch. 428, § 6.

57-2-109. Adoption of ordinance to prohibit construction or operation of licensed manufacturer under § 57-3-202 — Applicability.

Any city with a population of no less than five thousand eight hundred seventy (5,870) and no greater than five thousand eight hundred seventy-nine (5,879), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census may adopt an ordinance to prohibit the construction or operation of any licensed manufacturer in §57-3-202 within one thousand feet (1,000') of the state right-of-way of U.S. Highway 441 within the corporate limits of such city. This section shall not affect any licensed manufacturer in operation and open to the public before or on March 24, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 695, § 1.

Complier's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee municipalities, see Volume 13 and its supplement.